Utah statutes.
76-8-306.5.   Obstructing service of a Board of Pardons' warrant or a probationer order to show cause.

A person is guilty of a third degree felony who:

(1)  knows that the Board of Pardons and Parole has issued a warrant for a parolee or that a court has issued an order to show cause regarding a defendant's violation of the terms of probation; and

(2) (a)  harbors or conceals the parolee or probationer;

(b)  provides the parolee or probationer with transportation, disguise, or other means or assistance to avoid discovery; or

(c)  warns the parolee or probationer of his impending discovery.

